Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-286
Ephemeral natural stream, defined.

An ephemeral natural stream shall mean that portion of a natural stream in which water flows only after a precipitation event or when augmented by surface water runoff caused by the pumping of ground water for irrigation. The portion of a natural stream that is shown as an intermittent stream on the most recent United States Geological Survey topographic quadrangle map published prior to July 18, 2008, shall be considered an ephemeral natural stream unless the Chief Water Officer has investigated the stream and determined that the stream or a reach of the stream is perennial or intermittent and subject to Chapter 46, article 2. The Chief Water Officer's determination for the purposes of this section shall be adopted and promulgated in rule or regulation.

Laws 1980, LB 908, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 508, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB798, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 107.